Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2917
Foreign animal or transboundary disease, defined.

Foreign animal or transboundary disease means a disease not endemic to the United States or which has been eradicated in the United States, and which is of significant economic, trade, and food security importance.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 17.